New Jersey, session 221, A723.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Transportation shall establish a program to provide additional safe parking zones on, along, of near federal-aid highways in the State for use by commercial motor vehicles and the operators of such vehicles. Within six months of the effective date of this act, the department shall provide a report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), the Legislature that provides prospective locations for such additional safe parking zones.  Annually thereafter, the department shall provide a report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), the Legislature that provides information on the program, including the total number of dollars expended under the program, the number of additional safe parking spaces created pursuant to the program, the location of the additional safe parking zones and spaces, any impact the department has noted on highway safety as a result of the program, and any other information that the Commissioner of Transportation determines is appropriate.  The department shall provide such reports until the funds appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act are fully exhausted. 2.    To the extent consistent with federal law, there is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Transportation up to $50,000,000 from a portion of the funds allocated to the State, pursuant to the provisions of the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Pub.L.117-58, for the eligible costs to provide additional safe parking zones on, along, or near federal-aid highways in the State for use by commercial motor vehicles and the operators of such vehicles. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.